Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 11.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2778
Income tax; deficiency; written protest; time.

Within sixty days after the mailing of a deficiency notice, or one hundred fifty days if the taxpayer is outside the United States, the taxpayer or any person directly interested may file with the Tax Commissioner a written protest against the proposed assessment in which he or she shall set forth the grounds on which the protest is based. If a protest is filed, the Tax Commissioner shall reconsider the assessment of the deficiency and, if the taxpayer has so requested, shall grant the taxpayer or his or her authorized representative an oral hearing. For purposes of this section, a person shall be directly interested in a deficiency determination when such deficiency could be collected from such person.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 78, p. 1605;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 64;

Laws 1994, LB 977, § 17;

Laws 2008, LB914, § 11.